Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the estate tax incentivizes the out-of-state migration of individuals and families and is responsible for reducing Washington state's economic competitiveness relative to other states. To maintain Washington as a desirable place where individuals and families choose to reside, invest, and thrive, the legislature recognizes the need to repeal policies that discourage growth, innovation, and prosperity.This tax has disproportionately affected economic activity and disadvantaged individuals and families who lack the means to avoid its impact. These dynamics exacerbate imbalances in the tax system and place additional burdens on those unable to navigate or mitigate the tax's effects. By repealing this tax, the legislature aims to create a fairer, more competitive economic environment that encourages the retention and attraction of diverse talent and investment.Moreover, addressing this tax aligns with the state's commitment to fostering opportunity and ensuring that Washington remains an attractive destination for individuals, families, and businesses seeking to contribute to and benefit from its robust economy and quality of life.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 83.100.010 (Short title) and 2005 c 516 s 19, 1988 c 64 s 1, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.010;(2) RCW 83.100.020 (Definitions) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2, 2013 c 23 s 341, 2005 c 516 s 2, 2001 c 320 s 15, 1999 c 358 s 19, 1998 c 292 s 401, 1994 c 221 s 70, 1993 c 73 s 9, 1990 c 224 s 1, 1988 c 64 s 2, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.020;(3) RCW 83.100.040 (Estate tax imposedâAmount of tax) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 4, 2010 c 106 s 234, 2005 c 516 s 3, 1988 c 64 s 4, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.040;(4) RCW 83.100.046 (DeductionâProperty used for farmingâRequirements, conditions) and 2010 c 106 s 236, (2010 c 106 s 235 expired January 1, 2014), 2009 c 521 s 191, 2005 c 514 s 1201, & 2005 c 516 s 4;(5) RCW 83.100.047 (Marital deduction, qualified domestic trustâElectionâState registered domestic partner entitled to deductionâOther deductions taken for income tax purposes disallowed) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 6, (2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 5 expired January 1, 2014), 2009 c 521 s 192, & 2005 c 516 s 13;(6) RCW 83.100.048 (DeductionâQualified family-owned business interests) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3;(7) RCW 83.100.050 (Tax returnsâFiling datesâExtensionsâExtensions during state of emergencyâExemption) and 2024 c 82 s 1, 2017 c 323 s 601, 2008 c 181 s 504, 2005 c 516 s 5, 1988 c 64 s 6, 1986 c 44 s 1, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.050;(8) RCW 83.100.060 (Date payment dueâExtensions) and 2005 c 516 s 6, 1988 c 64 s 7, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.060;(9) RCW 83.100.070 (Interest on amount dueâPenalty for late filingâExceptionsâRules) and 2005 c 516 s 7, 2000 c 105 s 1, 1997 c 136 s 1, 1996 c 149 s 13, 1988 c 64 s 8, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.070;(10) RCW 83.100.080 (Department to issue release) and 1988 c 64 s 9, 1986 c 44 s 2, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.080;(11) RCW 83.100.090 (Amended returnsâAdjustments or final determinations) and 2005 c 516 s 8, 1988 c 64 s 10, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.090;(12) RCW 83.100.095 (Examination by department of returns, other informationâAssessment of additional tax, interest) and 2005 c 516 s 14;(13) RCW 83.100.110 (Tax lien) and 2005 c 516 s 9, 1988 c 64 s 11, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.110;(14) RCW 83.100.120 (Liability for failure to pay tax before distribution or delivery) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 7 & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.120;(15) RCW 83.100.130 (Refund for overpaymentâRequirements) and 2005 c 516 s 10, 1997 c 157 s 6, 1996 c 149 s 14, 1988 c 64 s 12, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.130;(16) RCW 83.100.140 (Criminal acts relating to tax returns) and 2005 c 516 s 11, 1988 c 64 s 13, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.140;(17) RCW 83.100.150 (Collection of taxâFindings filed in court) and 2005 c 516 s 12, 1988 c 64 s 14, & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.150;(18) RCW 83.100.160 (Clerk to give notice of filings) and 1993 c 413 s 1 & 1988 c 64 s 15;(19) RCW 83.100.170 (Court order) and 1988 c 64 s 16;(20) RCW 83.100.180 (Objections) and 1999 c 42 s 636 & 1988 c 64 s 17;(21) RCW 83.100.190 (Hearing by court) and 1988 c 64 s 18;(22) RCW 83.100.200 (AdministrationâRules) and 1988 c 64 s 19;(23) RCW 83.100.210 (Application of chapter 82.32 RCWâClosing agreements authorized) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 8, 2010 c 106 s 111, 2005 c 516 s 15, & 1996 c 149 s 18;(24) RCW 83.100.220 (Deposit of funds into education legacy trust account) and 2005 c 516 s 16;(25) RCW 83.100.901 (Section captions not part of law) and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.170;(26) RCW 83.100.902 (New chapter) and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.180;(27) RCW 83.100.903 (Effective dateâ1981 2nd ex.s. c 7) and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.190; and(28) RCW 83.100.906 (ConstructionâChapter applicable to state registered domestic partnershipsâ2009 c 521) and 2009 c 521 s 190.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. RCW 83.100.900 (Repeals and saving) is decodified.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. RCW 83.100.230 is recodified as a section in chapter 28A.150 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act applies to decedents dying on or after August 1, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act takes effect August 1, 2025.--- END ---